Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202614-204
City council; members; number; candidates; qualifications; filing.

(1) Each city of the metropolitan class shall elect seven city council members to the city council as provided in section 32-536. A candidate for city council member of a city of the metropolitan class shall be a registered voter and a resident of the district from which such candidate seeks election and shall have been a resident in the city and district or any area annexed by the city for six months.

(2) Any person desiring to become a candidate for city council member shall file a candidate filing form pursuant to sections 32-606 and 32-607.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. II, § 4, p. 420;

C.S.1922, § 3529;

C.S.1929, § 14-204;

R.S.1943, § 14-204;

Laws 1949, c. 16, § 2, p. 81;

Laws 1953, c. 21, § 1, p. 91;

Laws 1979, LB 80, § 3;

Laws 1979, LB 329, § 5;

Laws 1982, LB 807, § 39;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 471;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 38;

Laws 2025, LB521, § 3.